Utah statutes.
20A-7-702 (Superseded 01/01/12).   Voter information pamphlet -- Form -- Contents -- Distribution.

(1)  The lieutenant governor shall ensure that all information submitted for publication in the voter information pamphlet is:

(a)  printed and bound in a single pamphlet;

(b)  printed in clear readable type, no less than 10 point, except that the text of any measure may be set forth in eight-point type; and

(c)  printed on a quality and weight of paper that best serves the voters.

(2)  The voter information pamphlet shall contain the following items in this order:

(a)  a cover title page;

(b)  an introduction to the pamphlet by the lieutenant governor;

(c)  a table of contents;

(d)  a list of all candidates for constitutional offices;

(e)  a list of candidates for each legislative district;

(f)  a 100-word statement of qualifications for each candidate for the office of governor, lieutenant governor, attorney general, state auditor, or state treasurer, if submitted by the candidate to the lieutenant governor's office before 5 p.m. on the date that falls 105 days before the date of the election;

(g)  information pertaining to all measures to be submitted to the voters, beginning a new page for each measure and containing, in the following order for each measure:

(i)  a copy of the number and ballot title of the measure;

(ii)  the final vote cast by the Legislature on the measure if it is a measure submitted by the Legislature or by referendum;

(iii)  the impartial analysis of the measure prepared by the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel;

(iv)  the arguments in favor of the measure, the rebuttal to the arguments in favor of the measure, the arguments against the measure, and the rebuttal to the arguments against the measure, with the name and title of the authors at the end of each argument or rebuttal;

(v)  for each constitutional amendment, a complete copy of the text of the constitutional amendment, with all new language underlined, and all deleted language placed within brackets; 

(vi)  for each initiative qualified for the ballot, a copy of the measure as certified by the lieutenant governor and a copy of the fiscal impact estimate prepared according to Section 20A-7-202.5; and

(vii)  for each referendum qualified for the ballot, a complete copy of the text of the law being submitted to the voters for their approval or rejection, with all new language underlined and all deleted language placed within brackets, as applicable;

(h)  a description provided by the Judicial Council of the selection and retention process for judges, including, in the following order:

(i)  a description of the judicial selection process;

(ii)  a description of the judicial performance evaluation process;

(iii)  a description of the judicial retention election process;

(iv)  a list of the criteria and minimum standards of judicial performance evaluation;

(v)  the names of the judges standing for retention election; and

(vi)  for each judge:

(A)  the counties in which the judge is subject to retention election;

(B)  a short biography of professional qualifications and a recent photograph;

(C)  for each standard of performance, a statement identifying whether or not the judge met the standard and, if not, the manner in which the judge failed to meet the standard;

(D)  a statement provided by the Utah Supreme Court identifying the cumulative number of informal reprimands, when consented to by the judge in accordance with Title 78A, Chapter 11, Judicial Conduct Commission, formal reprimands, and all orders of censure and suspension issued by the Utah Supreme Court under Utah Constitution Article VIII, Section 13 during the judge's current term and the immediately preceding term, and a detailed summary of the supporting reasons for each violation of the Code of Judicial Conduct that the judge has received; and

(E)  a statement identifying whether or not the judge was certified by the Judicial Council;

(vii) (A)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(h)(vii)(B), for each judge, in graphic format, the responses for each attorney, jury, and other survey question used by the Judicial Council for certification of judges, displayed in 1% increments; and

(B)  notwithstanding Subsection (2)(h)(vii)(A), if the sample size for the survey for a particular judge is too small to provide statistically reliable information in 1% increments, the survey results for that judge shall be reported as being above or below 70% and a statement by the surveyor explaining why the survey is statistically unreliable shall also be included;

(i)  an explanation of ballot marking procedures prepared by the lieutenant governor, indicating the ballot marking procedure used by each county and explaining how to mark the ballot for each procedure;

(j)  voter registration information, including information on how to obtain an absentee ballot;

(k)  a list of all county clerks' offices and phone numbers; and

(l)  on the back cover page, a printed copy of the following statement signed by the lieutenant governor:

"I, _______________ (print name), Lieutenant Governor of Utah, certify that the measures contained in this pamphlet will be submitted to the voters of Utah at the election to be held throughout the state on ____ (date of election), and that this pamphlet is complete and correct according to law.  SEAL

Witness my hand and the Great Seal of the State, at Salt Lake City, Utah this ____ day of ____ (month), ____ (year)

(signed) ____________________________________

Lieutenant Governor"

(3)  The lieutenant governor shall not more than 40 nor less than 15 days before the date voting commences:

(a) (i)  distribute one copy of the voter information pamphlet to each household within the state; or

(ii)  ensure that one copy of the voter information pamphlet is placed in one issue of every newspaper of general circulation in the state;

(b)  ensure that a sufficient number of printed voter information pamphlets are available for distribution as required by this section;

(c)  provide voter information pamphlets to each county clerk for free distribution upon request and for placement at polling places; and

(d)  ensure that the distribution of the voter information pamphlets is completed 15 days before the election.

